Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.090

Limit of pension.

All pensioners receiving a pension under the provisions of this chapter as provided for in section 12, chapter 91, Laws of 1947 and RCW 41.16.230, shall from and after April 25, 1973 receive a minimum pension of three hundred dollars per month.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 181 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 91 s 2; 1959 c 5 s 3; 1957 c 82 s 3. Prior: 1947 c 91 s 8, part; 1935 c 39 s 2, part; 1929 c 86 s 2, part; 1919 c 196 s 4, part; 1909 c 50 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-47, part.]